apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="ordal__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iers</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ierna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iernas</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nom/en__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enet</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enets</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enen</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enens</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="scar/f__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fs</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fen</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fens</l>      <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>far</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fars</l>      <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>farna</l>     <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vesen</l>     <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>farnas</l>    <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vesens</l>    <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dego__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarnas</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="b/onde__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondes</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onden</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondens</l>    <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önder</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önders</l>    <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önderna</l>   <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öndernas</l>  <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rubbet__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bitum/en__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inet</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inets</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gag__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="vitögat">         <i>vitögat</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="trekropparsproblemet"><i>trekropparsproblemet</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fyrasnåret">      <i>fyrasnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="femsnåret">       <i>femsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="roadie">          <i>roadie</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="guinea">          <i>guinea</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="wafer">           <i>wafer</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ordal">           <i>ordal</i><par n="ordal__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="streamer">        <i>streamer</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="free-style">      <i>free-style</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="scarf">           <i>scar</i><par n="scar/f__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="escudo">          <i>escudo</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dago">            <i>dago</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sexsnåret">       <i>sexsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rookie">          <i>rookie</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="åttasnåret">      <i>åttasnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="provie">          <i>provie</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="femtonsnåret">    <i>femtonsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="oldtimer">        <i>oldtimer</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ultra">           <i>ultra</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nomen">           <i>nom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="elvasnåret">      <i>elvasnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="papua">           <i>papua</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sextonsnåret">    <i>sextonsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fjortonsnåret">   <i>fjortonsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="peseta">          <i>peseta</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nittonsnåret">    <i>nittonsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ranger">          <i>ranger</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dövörat">         <i>dövörat</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="eye-liner">       <i>eye-liner</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gag">             <i>gag</i><par n="gag__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="butler">          <i>butler</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="medelhavsområdet"><i>medelhavsområdet</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tjugoettsnåret">  <i>tjugoettsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="snapshot">        <i>snapshot</i><par n="gag__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="relativpronomen"> <i>relativpronom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sjuttonsnåret">   <i>sjuttonsnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gold-digger">     <i>gold-digger</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pronomen">        <i>pronom</i><par n="nom/en__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tjugotresnåret">  <i>tjugotresnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tvåkropparsproblemet"><i>tvåkropparsproblemet</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bagel">           <i>bagel</i><par n="dego__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tresnåret">       <i>tresnåret</i><par n="rubbet__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skattebonde">     <i>skatteb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hästbonde">       <i>hästb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fribonde">        <i>frib</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="husbonde">        <i>husb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kungsbonde">      <i>kungsb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="frälsebonde">     <i>frälseb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bonde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mjölkbonde">      <i>mjölkb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ankbonde">        <i>ankb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="grisbonde">       <i>grisb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vallbonde">       <i>vallb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="köttbonde">       <i>köttb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="storbonde">       <i>storb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="småbonde">        <i>småb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="järnåldersbonde"> <i>järnåldersb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trottoarbonde">   <i>trottoarb</i><par n="b/onde__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bitumen">         <i>bitum</i><par n="bitum/en__n_nt"/></e>
